Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4611
Requisites for exercise of power of appointment.

A power of appointment is exercised only:

(1) if the instrument exercising the power is valid under applicable law;

(2) if the terms of the instrument exercising the power:

(A) manifest the powerholder's intent to exercise the power; and

(B) subject to section 30-4614, satisfy the requirements of exercise, if any, imposed by the donor; and

(3) to the extent the appointment is a permissible exercise of the power.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 34.